Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-331.01
Handicapped or disabled parking
permit, defined.

Handicapped or disabled parking permit means a permit issued by the department that authorizes the use
of parking spaces and access aisles that have been designated for the exclusive
use of handicapped or disabled persons.

Laws 2011, LB163, § 19;

Laws 2014, LB657, § 3.